West Virginia, session 2026, HB4573.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 5. COUNTY BOARD OF EDUCATION. §18-5-55. Foster youth post-secondary transition support. (a) Information sharing by the Department of Human Services. – The Department of Human Services ("DoHS") shall, using electronic communication to minimize cost, provide to the West Virginia Department of Education and county boards of education information regarding available post-secondary transition programs and services for students with current or former foster care experience.(b) The information shared under this subsection may include, but is not limited to:(1) Post-secondary education opportunities;(2) Workforce training and career technical programs;(3) Housing assistance and independent living services;(4) Financial aid, scholarships, and tuition assistance;(5) Counseling, mentoring, and support services; and(6) Any other state or federally funded transitional programs available to foster youth.(c) Continued direct communication permitted. – Nothing in this section shall prohibit the Department of Human Services from continuing to share information directly with students in foster care and their foster families or legal guardians as part of routine case management and service delivery, provided such communication complies with applicable privacy laws.(d) Integration into personal education planning. – Each county board of education shall ensure that information received pursuant to subsection (a) is shared with appropriate school personnel and used for student informational purposes only, as follows:(1) Beginning in grade eight, for students in foster care, the availability of post-secondary transition programs shall be discussed during the student’s Personal Education Planning ("PEP") process so that the student and family are aware of available supports; and(2) For students in grades nine through twelve, the school shall provide periodic informational touch points throughout high school, including at least one discussion per school year, to ensure continued awareness of available transition programs and services.(e) Privacy protections. – Nothing in this section requires the disclosure of a student’s foster care status in violation of state or federal privacy laws, including the Family Educational Rights and Privacy Act ("FERPA"). Bill Status  | Bill Tracking  | Legacy WV Code  | Bulletin Board  | District Maps  | Senate Roster  | House Roster  | Live  | Blog  | Jobs  | Links  | Home